Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 5 Community Services for the Developmentally Disabled

Editor’s notes.
— For application of this chapter in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 09.30.20.02,10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02,11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01,
3.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Cross references.

Child, family, or group-care facility operators prohibited from employing or allowing to reside or be domiciled persons with certain past criminal violations, §

16-12-1.1

Day-care centers for the developmentally disabled, §

37-6-1

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this chapter in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 09.30.20.02,10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02,11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 3.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and
05.28.21.02.

For application of this chapter in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 09.30.20.02,10.15.20.01, 10.30.20.02,11.13.20.01, 11.30.20.02, 12.08.20.01, 12.30.20.02, 01.15.21.01, 01.29.21.02, 02.15.21.01, 02.26.21.02, 03.12.21.01, 3.31.21.03, 04.30.21.01, and
05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.

37-5-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Community Services Act for the Developmentally Disabled.”

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-5-2.
Declaration of policy.

Since the State of Georgia accepts a responsibility for its developmentally disabled citizens and an obligation to them which it must discharge, facilities, programs, and services shall be made available to meet the needs of each developmentally disabled
person during his entire lifetime. The primary purpose of this chapter shall be to provide community based alternatives to total institutional care so that developmentally disabled individuals can continue to live in their home communities.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 878, § 37/HB 1387.

37-5-3.
Community services defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “community services” means a coordinated, consumer and family centered, consumer and family directed, and comprehensive system of community services, individualized supports, and other forms of assistance that enable
individuals with developmental disabilities to exercise self-determination, be independent, be productive, and be integrated and included in all facets of community life. Such services shall include those deemed reasonably necessary
by the department to provide for education, training, rehabilitation, and care of individuals with developmental disabilities and shall include but not be limited to: diagnostic and evaluation services; day-care and training services;
work-activity services; support coordination, day support, and personal support services; supportive employment services; community residential services such as group family-care homes, community living arrangements, and host homes;
transportation services incidental to educational, training, and rehabilitation services; technology and durable equipment support and services; social services; medical services; and specified home services.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2502, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, p. 499, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 3; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-16/HB 228.

37-5-4.
Applicability of chapter; eligibility for community services.

This chapter shall apply to all county boards of health in Georgia and to the Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities.

Developmentally disabled individuals who are not eligible to receive community services from other public agencies and developmentally disabled individuals who are not in fact receiving such services shall be entitled to receive all services afforded
under this chapter.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-5/HB 228.

37-5-5.
Duty of county board of health to provide community services; district health department to advise families or guardians of developmentally disabled individuals.

County boards of health shall, subject to limitations herein specified, provide community services and shall employ such personnel as may be needed to serve developmentally disabled individuals in their respective counties.

The district health department shall be the source of referral and information for the families or guardians of developmentally disabled individuals providing lifetime advice and guidance and referral to appropriate services.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 5; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-5-6.
County or health district plan for community services; review and approval of plan by the department.

Each county board of health shall, on or before July 1, 1973, submit to the department a plan for providing comprehensive community services to developmentally disabled individuals residing in the county, provided that any group of counties comprising
a health district may join and submit one plan covering the entire health district. The plan shall state:

An estimate of the number of developmentally disabled individuals residing in the county who require services afforded by this chapter;

A description of the specific services required by developmentally disabled individuals residing in the county;

A description of physical facilities available for use in providing the required community services;

A description of physical facilities, if any, which must be constructed to provide the necessary services;

A proposed staff roster of professional and nonprofessional employees who must be hired to provide necessary services; and

A detailed budget showing all costs of providing the necessary services for fiscal years 1977, 1978, and 1979 and a summary budget for each fiscal year from 1980 through 1985 inclusive.

The department shall provide assistance to county boards of health in preparing the plan required by subsection (a) of this Code section.

The department shall review the plan submitted by each county or district as required by subsection (a) of this Code section and shall suggest such changes as may be necessary to achieve the objectives of this chapter.

On or before July 1, 1975, the department shall publish in print or electronically an approved plan for each county or health district which shall address each point set out in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

37-5-7.
Duty of department to provide consulting and financial assistance to county boards of health; failure of county boards of health to provide community services.

The Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Disabilities shall provide assistance to county boards of health in developing a full range of community services for the developmentally disabled through consultation and provision of standards. The
department shall assist county boards of health in obtaining federal funds where such resources are available and shall finance 100 percent of all operating costs not borne by federal funds.

Should a county board of health fail to take the necessary action to provide approved community services for developmentally disabled individuals, the department shall be empowered to establish and operate such services in lieu of operation by such county
board of health.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 3-2, 3-5/HB 228.

37-5-8.
Duty of department to establish standards for community services, inspect programs, issue statements of approval; procedure upon discovery of deficiencies; reinspection.

The department shall establish standards for community services, shall regularly inspect programs under operation, and shall issue statements of approval to programs which meet state standards. Where deficiencies are found, county boards of health shall
be notified and a reasonable time to correct such deficiencies shall be allowed. Reinspections shall be made as necessary to assure state approval of services.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 8.

37-5-9.
Fees for community services.

The department and its contractors are authorized to charge fees for community services they provide under this chapter based upon ability to pay, in accordance with guidelines established by the department. When such services are provided by county boards
of health, Code Section 31-3-4 authorizes the establishment of fees for the services. No person shall be denied services on the basis of inability to pay.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 9; Ga. L. 1989, p. 459, § 1.

37-5-10.
[Repealed] Timetable for implementation of this chapter.

History.
Ga. L. 1972, p. 700, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-17/HB 228; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 4-7/HB 252, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 385, § 1-1/HB 252, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘J. Calvin Hill, Jr., Act.’ ”